fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
# This Source Code Form is subject to the terms of the BrowserWorks Public
# License, v. 2.0. If a copy of the MPL was not distributed with this
# file, You can obtain one at http://mozilla.org/MPL/2.0/.

# AFFIXES DU DICTIONNAIRE ORTHOGRAPHIQUE FRANÇAIS “TOUTES VARIANTES” v7.7
# par Olivier R. -- licence MPL 2.0
# Pour améliorer le dictionnaire, allez sur https://grammalecte.net/



SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS -’'1234567890.


TRY esntiarulodcpmévqfgbhàxèjyêMILzACçôîPâùJFSûBVœRDGNETHXkïOwKWYUëQÉZŒüãÎáöóÈíæÅñäśńÿ


MAP 25
MAP aàâäAÀÂÄ
MAP eéèêëEÉÈÊË
MAP iîïyIÎÏY
MAP oôöOÔÖ
MAP uùûüUÙÛÜ
MAP cçCÇ
MAP bB
MAP dD
MAP fF
MAP gG
MAP hH
MAP jJ
MAP kK
MAP lL
MAP mM
MAP nN
MAP pP
MAP qQ
MAP rR
MAP sS
MAP tT
MAP vV
MAP wW
MAP xX
MAP zZ

REP 110
REP a â
REP â a
REP e é
REP é e
REP e ê
REP ê e
REP e è
REP è e
REP i î
REP î i
REP o ô
REP ô o
REP u û
REP û u
REP A Â
REP Â A
REP E É
REP É E
REP E Ê
REP Ê E
REP E È
REP È E
REP I Î
REP Î I
REP O Ô
REP Ô O
REP U Û
REP Û U
REP ^Ca$ Ça
REP ^l l'
REP ^d d'
REP ^n n'
REP ^s s'
REP ^j j'
REP ^m m'
REP ^t t'
REP ^c c'
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP c qu
REP qu c
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP x ct
REP ct x
REP bb b
REP b bb
REP cc c
REP c cc
REP ff f
REP f ff
REP ll l
REP l ll
REP mm m
REP m mm
REP nn n
REP n nn
REP pp p
REP p pp
REP rr r
REP r rr
REP ss s
REP s ss
REP ss c
REP c ss
REP ss ç
REP ç ss
REP tt t
REP t tt
REP œ oe
REP oe œ
REP æ ae
REP ae æ
REP ai é
REP é ai
REP ai è
REP è ai
REP ai ê
REP ê ai
REP ei é
REP é ei
REP ei è
REP è ei
REP ei ê
REP ê ei
REP o au
REP au o
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP ett èt
REP èt ett
REP ell èl
REP èl ell
REP t th
REP th t
REP ième$ e
REP ème$ e
REP è$ e
REP mn$ min
REP ogue$ ogiste
REP ogiste$ ogue
REP disez$ dites
REP fesez$ faites
REP faisez$ faites
REP puit puits
REP sanctionnable punissable
REP questionnable discutable
REP antitartre détartrant
REP email courriel
REP construirent construisirent




KEY azertyuiop|qsdfghjklmù|wxcvbn|aéz|yèu|iço|oàp|aqz|zse|edr|rft|tgy|yhu|uji|iko|olpm|qws|sxd|dcf|fvg|gbh|hnj

ICONV 42
ICONV ’ '
ICONV ʼ '
ICONV ﬃ ffi
ICONV ﬄ ffl
ICONV ﬀ ff
ICONV ﬅ ft
ICONV ﬁ fi
ICONV ﬂ fl
ICONV ﬆ st
ICONV ſ s
ICONV à à
ICONV â â
ICONV ä ä
ICONV é é
ICONV è è
ICONV ê ê
ICONV ë ë
ICONV î î
ICONV ï ï
ICONV ô ô
ICONV ö ö
ICONV ù ù
ICONV û û
ICONV ü ü
ICONV ÿ ÿ
ICONV ç ç
ICONV À À
ICONV Â Â
ICONV Ä Ä
ICONV É É
ICONV È È
ICONV Ê Ê
ICONV Ë Ë
ICONV Î Î
ICONV Ï Ï
ICONV Ô Ô
ICONV Ö Ö
ICONV Ù Ù
ICONV Û Û
ICONV Ü Ü
ICONV Ÿ Ÿ
ICONV Ç Ç

OCONV 1
OCONV ' ’



FLAG long

FULLSTRIP

NEEDAFFIX ()

FORBIDDENWORD {}

CIRCUMFIX **

KEEPCASE ||

NOSUGGEST --



BREAK 7
BREAK -
BREAK .
BREAK ·
BREAK ^‘
BREAK ^'
BREAK '$
BREAK ’$






PFX L' Y 34
PFX L' 0 l' .
PFX L' a l'A a
PFX L' à l'À à
PFX L' â l'Â â
PFX L' e l'E e
PFX L' é l'É é
PFX L' è l'È è
PFX L' ê l'Ê ê
PFX L' i l'I i
PFX L' î l'Î î
PFX L' o l'O o
PFX L' ô l'Ô ô
PFX L' u l'U u
PFX L' y l'Y y
PFX L' h l'H h
PFX L' œ l'Œ œ
PFX L' æ l'Æ æ
PFX L' 0 L' .
PFX L' a L'A a
PFX L' à L'À à
PFX L' â L'Â â
PFX L' e L'E e
PFX L' é L'É é
PFX L' è L'È è
PFX L' ê L'Ê ê
PFX L' i L'I i
PFX L' î L'Î î
PFX L' o L'O o
PFX L' ô L'Ô ô
PFX L' u L'U u
PFX L' y L'Y y
PFX L' h L'H h
PFX L' œ L'Œ œ
PFX L' æ L'Æ æ

PFX D' Y 34
PFX D' 0 d' .
PFX D' a d'A a
PFX D' à d'À à
PFX D' â d'Â â
PFX D' e d'E e
PFX D' é d'É é
PFX D' è d'È è
PFX D' ê d'Ê ê
PFX D' i d'I i
PFX D' î d'Î î
PFX D' o d'O o
PFX D' ô d'Ô ô
PFX D' u d'U u
PFX D' y d'Y y
PFX D' h d'H h
PFX D' œ d'Œ œ
PFX D' æ d'Æ æ
PFX D' 0 D' .
PFX D' a D'A a
PFX D' à D'À à
PFX D' â D'Â â
PFX D' e D'E e
PFX D' é D'É é
PFX D' è D'È è
PFX D' ê D'Ê ê
PFX D' i D'I i
PFX D' î D'Î î
PFX D' o D'O o
PFX D' ô D'Ô ô
PFX D' u D'U u
PFX D' y D'Y y
PFX D' h D'H h
PFX D' œ D'Œ œ
PFX D' æ D'Æ æ

PFX Q' Y 34
PFX Q' 0 qu' .
PFX Q' a qu'A a
PFX Q' à qu'À à
PFX Q' â qu'Â â
PFX Q' e qu'E e
PFX Q' é qu'É é
PFX Q' è qu'È è
PFX Q' ê qu'Ê ê
PFX Q' i qu'I i
PFX Q' î qu'Î î
PFX Q' o qu'O o
PFX Q' ô qu'Ô ô
PFX Q' u qu'U u
PFX Q' y qu'Y y
PFX Q' h qu'H h
PFX Q' œ qu'Œ œ
PFX Q' æ qu'Æ æ
PFX Q' 0 Qu' .
PFX Q' a Qu'A a
PFX Q' à Qu'À à
PFX Q' â Qu'Â â
PFX Q' e Qu'E e
PFX Q' é Qu'É é
PFX Q' è Qu'È è
PFX Q' ê Qu'Ê ê
PFX Q' i Qu'I i
PFX Q' î Qu'Î î
PFX Q' o Qu'O o
PFX Q' ô Qu'Ô ô
PFX Q' u Qu'U u
PFX Q' y Qu'Y y
PFX Q' h Qu'H h
PFX Q' œ Qu'Œ œ
PFX Q' æ Qu'Æ æ

PFX Q* Y 6
PFX Q* 0 quoiqu' .
PFX Q* 0 puisqu' .
PFX Q* 0 lorsqu' .
PFX Q* 0 Quoiqu' .
PFX Q* 0 Puisqu' .
PFX Q* 0 Lorsqu' .

PFX Qj Y 1
PFX Qj 0 jusqu' .

PFX Si Y 1
PFX Si 0 s' i[le]

SFX S. Y 2
SFX S. 0 0/L'D'Q' [^sxz]
SFX S. 0 s/D'Q' [^sxz]

SFX S= Y 1
SFX S= 0 s/L'D'Q' [^sxz]

SFX X. Y 4
SFX X. 0 0/L'D'Q' [ul]
SFX X. 0 x/D'Q' [aeoœ]u
SFX X. l ux/D'Q' al
SFX X. il ux/D'Q' ail

SFX A. Y 11
SFX A. 0 0/L'D'Q' [^sxz]
SFX A. 0 0/L'D'Q' [sxz]
SFX A. 0 s/D'Q' [^sxz]
SFX A. an en/D'Q' an
SFX A. f ves/D'Q' f
SFX A. h hes/D'Q' h
SFX A. s ses/D'Q' s
SFX A. x xes/D'Q' x
SFX A. y ies/D'Q' y
SFX A. zz zzes/D'Q' zz
SFX A. z zzes/D'Q' [^z]z

SFX I. Y 9
SFX I. 0 0/L'D'Q' [^sxz]
SFX I. 0 0/L'D'Q' [sxz]
SFX I. 0 s/D'Q' [^sxz]
SFX I. a e/D'Q' a
SFX I. e i/D'Q' e
SFX I. en ina/D'Q' en
SFX I. o i/D'Q' o
SFX I. um a/D'Q' um
SFX I. us i/D'Q' us

SFX F. Y 33
SFX F. 0 0/L'D'Q' [^sxz]
SFX F. 0 s/D'Q' [^sxz]
SFX F. 0 0/L'D'Q' [sxz]
SFX F. 0 e/L'D'Q' [éiïudhlsz]
SFX F. 0 es/D'Q' [éiïudhlsz]
SFX F. 0 e/L'D'Q' [^e][knmrt]
SFX F. 0 es/D'Q' [^e][knmrt]
SFX F. ec èche/L'D'Q' sec
SFX F. ec èches/D'Q' sec
SFX F. ef ève/L'D'Q' ef
SFX F. ef èves/D'Q' ef
SFX F. ète étesse/L'D'Q' ète
SFX F. ète étesses/D'Q' ète
SFX F. f ve/L'D'Q' [iïu]f
SFX F. f ves/D'Q' [iïu]f
SFX F. 0 e/L'D'Q' of
SFX F. 0 es/D'Q' of
SFX F. ek èke/L'D'Q' ek
SFX F. ek èkes/D'Q' ek
SFX F. en ène/L'D'Q' en
SFX F. en ènes/D'Q' en
SFX F. er ère/L'D'Q' er
SFX F. er ères/D'Q' er
SFX F. et ète/L'D'Q' et
SFX F. et ètes/D'Q' et
SFX F. c que/L'D'Q' [iru]c
SFX F. c ques/D'Q' [iru]c
SFX F. 0 que/L'D'Q' grec
SFX F. 0 ques/D'Q' grec
SFX F. 0 he/L'D'Q' blanc
SFX F. 0 hes/D'Q' blanc
SFX F. 0 ue/L'D'Q' long
SFX F. 0 ues/D'Q' long

SFX Fs Y 4
SFX Fs 0 0/L'D'Q' eur
SFX Fs 0 s/D'Q' eur
SFX Fs r se/L'D'Q' eur
SFX Fs r ses/D'Q' eur

SFX Fc Y 4
SFX Fc 0 0/L'D'Q' [td]eur
SFX Fc 0 s/D'Q' [td]eur
SFX Fc eur rice/L'D'Q' [td]eur
SFX Fc eur rices/D'Q' [td]eur

SFX Fe Y 4
SFX Fe 0 0/L'D'Q' eur
SFX Fe 0 s/D'Q' eur
SFX Fe eur eresse/L'D'Q' eur
SFX Fe eur eresses/D'Q' eur

SFX Gs Y 2
SFX Gs r se/L'D'Q' eur
SFX Gs r ses/D'Q' eur

SFX Gc Y 2
SFX Gc eur rice/L'D'Q' [td]eur
SFX Gc eur rices/D'Q' [td]eur

SFX Ge Y 2
SFX Ge eur eresse/L'D'Q' eur
SFX Ge eur eresses/D'Q' eur

SFX Go Y 2
SFX Go eur oresse/L'D'Q' teur
SFX Go eur oresses/D'Q' teur

SFX F+ Y 19
SFX F+ 0 0/L'D'Q' [^sxz]
SFX F+ 0 s/D'Q' [^sxz]
SFX F+ 0 0/L'D'Q' [sxz]
SFX F+ 0 sse/L'D'Q' e
SFX F+ 0 sses/D'Q' e
SFX F+ 0 fe/L'D'Q' f
SFX F+ 0 fes/D'Q' f
SFX F+ 0 le/L'D'Q' l
SFX F+ 0 les/D'Q' l
SFX F+ 0 ne/L'D'Q' n
SFX F+ 0 nes/D'Q' n
SFX F+ 0 se/L'D'Q' s
SFX F+ 0 ses/D'Q' s
SFX F+ 0 te/L'D'Q' t
SFX F+ 0 tes/D'Q' t
SFX F+ u l/L'D'Q' [mf]ou
SFX F+ u ls/D'Q' [mf]ou
SFX F+ u lle/L'D'Q' [mf]ou
SFX F+ u lles/D'Q' [mf]ou

SFX Fx Y 25
SFX Fx 0 0/L'D'Q' foufou
SFX Fx 0 s/D'Q' foufou
SFX Fx ufou folle/L'D'Q' foufou
SFX Fx ufou folles/D'Q' foufou
SFX Fx 0 0/L'D'Q' frais
SFX Fx is îche/L'D'Q' frais
SFX Fx is îches/D'Q' frais
SFX Fx is iche/L'D'Q' frais
SFX Fx is iches/D'Q' frais
SFX Fx 0 0/L'D'Q' pignouf
SFX Fx 0 s/D'Q' pignouf
SFX Fx 0 e/L'D'Q' pignouf
SFX Fx 0 es/D'Q' pignouf
SFX Fx 0 0/L'D'Q' in
SFX Fx 0 s/D'Q' in
SFX Fx in igne/L'D'Q' in
SFX Fx in ignes/D'Q' in
SFX Fx 0 e/L'D'Q' malin
SFX Fx 0 es/D'Q' malin
SFX Fx 0 0/L'D'Q' gu
SFX Fx 0 s/D'Q' gu
SFX Fx 0 ë/L'D'Q' gu
SFX Fx 0 ës/D'Q' gu
SFX Fx u üe/L'D'Q' gu
SFX Fx u ües/D'Q' gu

SFX W. Y 10
SFX W. 0 0/L'D'Q' [lu]
SFX W. l ux/D'Q' al
SFX W. l le/L'D'Q' al
SFX W. l les/D'Q' al
SFX W. 0 x/D'Q' eau
SFX W. au lle/L'D'Q' eau
SFX W. au lles/D'Q' eau
SFX W. 0 0/L'D'Q' ux
SFX W. x se/L'D'Q' ux
SFX W. x ses/D'Q' ux
