fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
Anhui/L'D'Q'
Anne-Sophie/L'D'Q'
BeF₂/L'D'Q'
Beernem/L'D'Q'
CH₂ClCOOH/L'D'Q'
CH₃COORb/L'D'Q'
Cimade/L'D'Q'
Claudine/L'D'Q'
C₃HN/L'D'Q'
C₄H₄/L'D'Q'
Doreen/L'D'Q'
Dubaï/L'D'Q'
Fernand/L'D'Q'
Gauteng/L'D'Q'
Géraldine/L'D'Q'
Jiangxi/L'D'Q'
Josèphe/L'D'Q'
Malcev/L'D'Q'
Marcela/L'D'Q'
Nouvelle-Écosse/L'D'Q'
Obwald/L'D'Q'
Roussillon/L'D'Q'
SPRL/L'D'Q'
Thonon-les-Bains/L'D'Q'
Tokyo/L'D'Q'
aérodynamiquement/L'D'Q'
affablement/L'D'Q'
aigu/Fx
ainsi/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
alentour/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
alors/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
amateur/F.Gc
ambigu/Fx
amèrement/L'D'Q'
amidonnier/F.
amodiateur/Fc
androconie/S.
anglo-iranien/F+
anormal/W.
après-demain/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
arbrisseau/X.
arioso/I.
asphalteur/Fs
assesseur/F.Gs
assez/L'D'Q'Q*
astronauticien/F+
attrape-clic/S=
au-dedans/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
au-delà/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
au-dessus/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
audiooral/W.
auquel/D'Q'Q*Qj
auteur/F.Gc
autoentreprise/S.
autopropulsé/F.
autoréalisateur/Fc
autrui/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
auxquelles/D'Q'Q*Qj
avec/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
bailleur/Fe
bateau/X.
bégu/Fx
bénin/Fx
bidouilleur/Fs
birationnel/F+
bocal/X.
body/A.
botteresse/S.
bouche-à-oreille/S=
bourru/F.
brouillardeux/W.
buggy/A.
businessman/A.
buveur/Fs
cadeau/X.
canzone/I.
carolorégien/F+
catastrophiquement/L'D'Q'
caucus/L'D'Q'
censeur/F.Gs
cent/S=
cent-et-unième/S.
cérébral/W.
cerveau/X.
cheminot/F.
cherry/A.
chômeur/Fs
chou/X.
coadaptateur/Fc
coagulum/I.
coalitionnel/F+
codemandeur/Fe
columbarium/I.
commandeur/FsGe
concaténation/S.
confiteor/L'D'Q'
conservateur/Fc
consistorial/W.
contigu/Fx
contrariant/F.
coprocureur/F.Gs
corbeau/X.
cornéen/F+
cracheur/Fs
cranberry/A.
cristal/X.
criterium/I.
cultivateur/Fc
daguerréotypie/S.
dandy/A.
décanal/W.
défendeur/Fe
défenseur/F.Gs
dégénérescent/F.
démarcheur/Fs
desideratum/I.
dessinateur/Fc
dionysien/F+
diploure/S.
docteur/F.Go
douanier/F.
drummeur/Fs
écheveau/X.
écumeux/W.
égalisateur/Fc
elles-mêmes/D'Q'Q*Qj
enchanteur/Fe
enfileur/Fs
enfin/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
enjolivement/S.
entre/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
entre-axes/L'D'Q'
entrelacs/L'D'Q'
entretemps/L'D'Q'Q*
essénien/F+
essieu/X.
étincelant/F.
étrangleur/Fs
eux/D'Q'Q*Qj
eux-mêmes/D'Q'Q*Qj
exemplum/I.
exigu/Fx
expirateur/Fc
fangeux/W.
ferrate/S.
feu/X.
flash/A.
fontanili/S=
foramen/I.
forgeron/F+
foudroyant/F.
foufou/Fx
frais/Fx
fricoteur/Fs
ftp/S=
fuseau/X.
garde-manger/L'D'Q'
gastroduodénal/W.
généticien/F+
gentleman/A.
germinateur/Fc
glapissement/S.
grognant/F.
grugeur/Fs
halitueux/W.
hermitien/F+
hobby/A.
hors/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
hors-jeu/X.
http/S=
hululement/S.
icelles/D'Q'Q*Qj
icelui/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
ici-bas/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
iel/D'Q'Q*QjSi
iel/D'Q'Q*QjSi
iel-même/D'Q'Q*QjSi
iels/D'Q'Q*QjSi
iels/D'Q'Q*QjSi
iels-mêmes/D'Q'Q*QjSi
il/D'Q'Q*QjSi
ils/D'Q'Q*QjSi
inapproprié/F.
incantateur/Fc
incommodément/L'D'Q'
inconciliablement/L'D'Q'
inégal/W.
intellectuel/F+
interfonctionnement/S.
intimidant/F.
inventeur/Fc
jardineux/W.
jet-society/A.
lâcheur/Fs
latifundium/I.
lavatory/A.
limite/S=
lingala/S.
luné/F.
madrinien/F+
mafioso/I.
mail-coach/A.
main-d'œuvre/L'D'Q'
malin/Fx
maquereau/X.
masseur/Fs
math/S=
maximisateur/Fc
méniscal/W.
mésozoaire/S.
miss/A.
monovoie/S=
montant/F.
muqarnas/D'Q'
murs/D'Q'
nécrologue/S.
néocalédonien/F+
nominateur/Fc
non-métal/X.
nuraghe/I.
oiseux/W.
on/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
opportun/F.
où/D'Q'Q*Qj
ouais/D'Q'Q*
ouvreur/Fs
pagode/S.
pagus/I.
panty/A.
passe-droit/S=
passe-lacet/S=
passe-montagne/S=
passe-pied/S=
passe-pierre/S=
passe-rose/S=
pécheur/Fe
pecorino/I.
pénien/F+
perce-oreille/S=
philippin/F.
photoconducteur/Fc
pignouf/Fx
pique-feu/X.
pisseur/Fs
pizzaiolo/I.
pluvieux/W.
poliment/L'D'Q'
porte-outil/S=
précurseur/F.Gs
prédécesseur/F.Gs
présomptueusement/L'D'Q'
presse-étoupe/L'D'Q'
procédure/S.
procureur/F.Gs
profanateur/Fc
prolifératif/F.
pubien/F+
putto/I.
quasi-cristal/X.
racheteur/Fs
rash/A.
rectificateur/Fc
remplisseur/Fs
résinier/F.
résurrecteur/Fc
réversal/W.
rush/A.
saxifrage/S.
scenario/I.
scrabbleur/Fs
sèche-cheveu/X.
sino-vietnamien/F+
slash/A.
soprano/I.
souscripteur/Fc
staturopondéral/W.
subaigu/Fx
successeur/F.Gs
super-huit/L'D'Q'
superwoman/A.
suppl/L'D'Q'
supposément/L'D'Q'
suraigu/Fx
surlignant/F.
tempo/I.
terraplane/S.
traineau/X.
transméditerranéen/F+
trotteur/Fs
tumulus/I.
t'elle/S=
un/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
une/L'D'Q'Q*Qj
urétral/W.
vengeur/Fe
vingt/S=
viticulteur/Fc
whisky/A.
xénocristal/X.
